src/fst/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation
noperiod ;
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
ab-nodot ;
ab-dot ;

LEXICON ab-noun
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

!LEXICON ab-adj
!ab-nodot-adj ;
!ab-dot-adj ;

!LEXICON ab-adv
!ab-nodot-adv ;
!ab-dot-adv ;

!LEXICON ab-num
!ab-nodot-num ;
!ab-dot-num;

! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk
+N+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR:%- ab-cases ; 

LEXICON ab-cases
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END_MINUS_ZERO_END ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;

+Der/sa+A:%>са A_ ;

LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.

! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
+ABBR:%. # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+N+ABBR:%. # ;

! The idea is that the nominal ones may have case, like e.g. P.E.N.


! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------

! The ones without final period are listed first. They do not
! need the transitivity division.

LEXICON noperiod
км² ab-nodot-noun ;
км ab-nodot-noun ;
см ab-nodot-noun ;
гг ab-nodot-noun ;
м3/с ab-nodot-noun ;
кв  ab-nodot-noun ;
лб  ab-nodot-noun ;

!ААНИИ ACRON-F ;
!АвтоВАЗ ACRON-F ;
!АККОР ACRON-F ;
!АН  ACRON-F ;
!АМР ACRON-F ;
!АО  ACRON-F ;
!АПК ACRON-F ;
!АПП ACRON-F ;
!АсПУр ACRON-F ;
!АСРОС ACRON-F ;
!АССР ACRON-F ;
!АТК  ACRON-F ;
!АТО ACRON-F ;
!АТОС ACRON-F ;
!АТП ACRON-F ;
!АТС ACRON-F ;
!АУ  ACRON-F ;
!АФУН ACRON-F ;
!БАМ ACRON-F ;
!БАО ACRON-F ;
!БЕАР ACRON-F ;
!БКП ACRON-F ;
!БМВ ACRON-F ;
!БМП ACRON-F ;
!БНР ACRON-F ;
!БРИЗ ACRON-F ;
!БРИКС ACRON-F ;
!БССР ACRON-F ;
!БТИ ACRON-F ;
!БТР ACRON-F ;
!ВАД ACRON-F ;
!ВАДА ACRON-F ;
!ВАЗ ACRON-F ;
!ВАИ ACRON-F ;
!ВАК ACRON-F ;
!ВАСХНИЛ ACRON-F ;
!ВАСХНИИЛ ACRON-F ;
!ВВК ACRON-F ;
!ВВС ACRON-F ;
!ВГИК ACRON-F ;
!ВГТРК ACRON-F ;
!ВДВ ACRON-F ;
!ВДК ACRON-F ;
!ВДНХ ACRON-F ;
!ВДПО ACRON-F ;
!ВЗУ ACRON-F ;
!ВИА  ACRON-F ;
!ВКСШ ACRON-F ;
!ВЛКСМ  ACRON-F ;
!ВМП  ACRON-F ;
!ВМС ACRON-F ;
!ВМФ  ACRON-F ;
!ВНИГРИ ACRON-F ;
!ВНИИ ACRON-F ;
!ВОБ ACRON-F ;
!ВОВ ACRON-F ;
!ВОЗ ACRON-F ;
!ВОИ ACRON-F ;
!ВОИР  ACRON-F ;
!ВООПИК  ACRON-F ;
!ВОХР  ACRON-F ;
!ВСНХ ACRON-F ;
!ВСУ ACRON-F ;
!ВСХВ ACRON-F ;
!ВТБ ACRON-F ;
!ВТО ACRON-F ;
!ВЦИОМ ACRON-F ;
!ВЦИОМС ACRON-F ;
!ВУЗ ACRON-F ;
!ВЦИК ACRON-F ;
!ВЦСПС ACRON-F ;
!ВЧК ACRON-F ;
!ГАИ  ACRON-F ;
!ГАУ ACRON-F ;
!ГБУ ACRON-F ;
!ГДР  ACRON-F ;
!ГИБДД ACRON-F ;
!ГИЗ ACRON-F ;
!ГИМС ACRON-F ;
!ГИТИС ACRON-F ;
!ГИХЛ ACRON-F ;
!ГКЧП ACRON-F ;
!ГлавПУР ACRON-F ;
!ГОМ  ACRON-F ;
!ГПС ACRON-F ;
!ГПТУ  ACRON-F ;
!ГПУ  ACRON-F ;
!ГРП  ACRON-F ;
!ГРПП ACRON-F ;
!ГРУ ACRON-F ;
!ГРЭС ACRON-F ;
!ГСВГ ACRON-F ;
!ГСМ ACRON-F ;
!ГСО ACRON-F ;
!ГТО ACRON-F ;
!ГТРК ACRON-F ;
!ГУ ACRON-F ;
!ГУЛАГ  ACRON-F ;
!ГУП ACRON-F ;
!ГУФСИН ACRON-F ;
!ГЭС  ACRON-F ;
!ДВП  ACRON-F ;
!ДЗОТ  ACRON-F ;
!ДИНА ACRON-F ;
!ДИП  ACRON-F ;
!ДКБ ACRON-F ;
!ДНД ACRON-F ;
!ДНР ACRON-F ;
!ДНТ ACRON-F ;
!ДОСААФ  ACRON-F ;
!ДПД  ACRON-F ;
!ДПМК ACRON-F ;
!ДПП ACRON-F ;
!ДПС ACRON-F ;
!ДРБ  ACRON-F ;
!ДРВ ACRON-F ;
!ДРСУ ACRON-F ;
!ДСК ACRON-F ;
!ДСО ACRON-F ;
!ДСУ ACRON-F ;
!ДТ  ACRON-F ;
!ДХС ACRON-F ;
!ДЭУ ACRON-F ;
!ДЮКФП ACRON-F ;
!ДЮСШ ACRON-F ;
!ДЮФКП ACRON-F ;
!ДЮШС ACRON-F ;
!ЕС ACRON-F ;
!ЕГЭ ACRON-F ;
!ЕТС ACRON-F ;
!ЖКО ACRON-F ;
!ЖКХ ACRON-F ;
!ЖЭС ACRON-F ;
!ЖЭУ  ACRON-F ;
!ЗАГС  ACRON-F ;
!ЗАО   ACRON-F ;
!ЗЖБИ ACRON-F ;
!ЗИЛ  ACRON-F ;
!ИВС ACRON-F ;
!ИГИЛ ACRON-F ;
!ИГИЛС ACRON-F ;
!ИК ACRON-F ;
!ИКП ACRON-F ;
!ИМЦП ACRON-F ;
!ИНО ACRON-F ;
!ИПК ACRON-F ;
!ИПККНО ACRON-F ;
!ИТК ACRON-F ;
!ИТР ACRON-F ;
!ИУУ  ACRON-F ;
!ИЯЛИ ACRON-F ;
!КамАЗ ACRON-F ;
!КАМАЗ ACRON-F ;
!КАПП  ACRON-F ;
!КАССР ACRON-F ;
!КБО  ACRON-F ;
!КВЖД ACRON-F ;
!КВН  ACRON-F ;
!КВЧ ACRON-F ;
!КГБ  ACRON-F ;
!КГПИ ACRON-F ;
!КИМ  ACRON-F ;
!КИП ACRON-F ;
!КИППТ  ACRON-F ;
!КИПТ ACRON-F ;
!КИР  ACRON-F ;
!ККОВ ACRON-F ;
!КМЕТ ACRON-F ;
!КНВ ACRON-F ;
!КНГ ACRON-F ;
!КНДР ACRON-F ;
!КНР  ACRON-F ;
!КНЦ ACRON-F ;
!КНШ ACRON-F ;
!КП  ACRON-F ;
!КПГ ACRON-F ;
!КПДН ACRON-F ;
!КПЗ  ACRON-F ;
!КПП ACRON-F ;
!КПРФ ACRON-F ;
!КПСС  ACRON-F ;
!КПТ ACRON-F ;
!КПУ ACRON-F ;
!КР ACRON ;
!КРАГСиУ ACRON-F ;
!КРАПТ ACRON-F ;
!КРБ ACRON-F ;
!КРИРО ACRON-F ;
!КРИРОиПК ACRON-F ;
!КРО ACRON-F ;
!КРОО ACRON-F ;
!КРТК ACRON-F ;
!КРЦДОД ACRON-F ;
!КТП ACRON-F ;
!КФХ ACRON-F ;
!КЭБ  ACRON-F ;
!ЛГУ ACRON-F ;
!ЛДК ACRON-F ;
!ЛДПР ACRON-F ;
!ЛЗУ ACRON-F ;
!ЛНР ACRON-F ;
!ЛПК  ACRON-F ;
!ЛПО ACRON-F ;
!ЛПХ ACRON-F ;
!ЛСГ ACRON-F ;
!ЛТО ACRON-F ;
!ЛУАД ACRON-F ;
!ЛУКОЙЛ ACRON-F ;
!ЛФК ACRON-F ;
!МА  ACRON-F ;
!МАГАТЭ ACRON-F ;
!МАЗ  ACRON-F ;
!МАФУН ACRON-F ;
!МВД  ACRON-F ;
!МВФ ACRON-F ;
!МГБ ACRON-F ;
!МГУ  ACRON-F ;
!МЖКХ ACRON-F ;
!МИД ACRON-F ;
!МКС ACRON-F ;
!ММС  ACRON-F ;
!МОД ACRON-F ;
!МОК  ACRON-F ;
!МОУ ACRON-F ;
!МП ACRON-F ;
!МПС  ACRON-F ;
!МР ACRON-F ;
!МРСК ACRON-F ;
!МСНК ACRON-F ;
!МТС  ACRON-F ;
!МТФ  ACRON-F ;
!МУК ACRON-F ;
!МУП ACRON-F ;
!МФЦ ACRON-F ;
!МХАТ ACRON-F ;
!МЧС ACRON-F ;
!МЭИ ACRON-F ;
!НА ACRON-F ;
!НАКЮ ACRON-F ;
!НАО ACRON-F ;
!НАСА ACRON-F ;
!НАТО ACRON-F ;
!НВХО ACRON-F ;
!НГДУ ACRON-F ;
!НИИ ACRON-F ;
!НИИУ ACRON-F ;
!НИЛ ACRON-F ;
!НИПТИ ACRON-F ;
!НКВД  ACRON-F ;
!НКГБ ACRON-F ;
!НКСД ACRON-F ;
!НКФ ACRON-F ;
!НЛО  ACRON-F ;
!НПЗ  ACRON-F ;
!НРБ ACRON-F ;
!НСШ ACRON-F ;
!НТВ ACRON-F ;
!НТР ACRON-F ;
!НХЛ ACRON-F ;
!ОАО ACRON-F ;
!ОАР ACRON-F ;
!ОАЭ ACRON-F ;
!ОблОНО ACRON-F ;
!ОбОНО ACRON-F ;
!ОБСЕ ACRON-F ;
!ОБЭП ACRON-F ;
!ОБХСС  ACRON-F ;
!ОВД ACRON-F ;
!ОВС  ACRON-F ;
!ОГИПТАД ACRON-F ;
!ОГПН ACRON-F ;
!ОГПУ  ACRON-F ;
!ОДВФ ACRON-F ;
!ОИКК ACRON-F ;
!ОК  ACRON-F ;
!ОКК-РКИ ACRON-F ;
!ОЛП ACRON-F ;
!ОМВД ACRON-F ;
!ОМОН ACRON-F ;
!ОМСН ACRON-F ;
!ОНО ACRON-F ;
!ОНФ ACRON-F ;
!ООН  ACRON-F ;
!ООО  ACRON-F ;
!ОРС  ACRON-F ;
!ОСВОД ACRON-F ;
!ОТК  ACRON-F ;
!ОТФ  ACRON-F ;
!ОУН ACRON-F ;
!ОУН-УПА ACRON-F ;
!ОУПД ACRON-F ;
!ПАК ACRON-F ;
!ПАО ACRON-F ;
!ПАТП ACRON-F ;
!ПВО ACRON-F ;
!ПДД ACRON-F ;
!ПечорНИУИ ACRON-F ;
!ПЛ ACRON-F ;
!ПМК  ACRON-F ;
!ПО ACRON-F ;
!ППС ACRON-F ;
!ПСК ACRON-F ;
!ПТО  ACRON-F ;
!ПТУ  ACRON-F ;
!ПУ ACRON-F ;
!ПУРП  ACRON-F ;
!ПЭВМ ACRON-F ;
!ПЭС  ACRON-F ;
!РАЕН ACRON-F ;
!РАМН ACRON-F ;
!РАН ACRON-F ;
!РАПО  ACRON-F ;
!РАПП  ACRON-F ;
!РАФУЖ ACRON-F ;
!РВА ACRON-F ;
!РГД  ACRON-F ;
!РГПУ ACRON-F ;
!РГУ ACRON-F ;
!РДК ACRON-F ;
!РДЮСШ ACRON-F ;
!РЖД ACRON-F ;
!РИА ACRON-F ;
!РИК  ACRON-F ;
!РИПКРО ACRON-F ;
!РК   ACRON-F ;
!РКИ ACRON-F ;
!РККА  ACRON-F ;
!РКП  ACRON-F ;
!РКСМ  ACRON-F ;
!РКЦ ACRON-F ;
!РМЗ ACRON-F ;
!РММ  ACRON-F ;
!РМЦ  ACRON-F ;
!РНА ACRON-F ;
!РО ACRON-F ;
!РОА ACRON-F ;
!РОВД ACRON-F ;
!РОНО ACRON-F ;
!РПД  ACRON-F ;
!РПП ACRON-F ;
!РПЦ ACRON-F ;
!РРМЦ ACRON-F ;
!РСДПР ACRON-F ;
!РСДРП  ACRON-F ;
!РСТ ACRON-F ;
!РСУ ACRON-F ;
!РСФРС ACRON-F ;
!РСФР ACRON-F ;
!РСФСР  ACRON-F ;
!РТ ACRON-F ;
!РТПЦ ACRON-F ;
!РТС  ACRON-F ;
!РУДН ACRON-F ;
!РУНО ACRON-F ;
!РФ   ACRON-F ;
!РЭБ ACRON-F ;
!РЭС ACRON-F ;
!РЭУ ACRON-F ;
!СБЕР ACRON-F ;
!СБУ ACRON-F ;
!СГУ  ACRON-F ;
!СД  ACRON-F ;
!СЕПГ ACRON-F ;
!СЗФО ACRON-F ;
!СИЗО ACRON-F ;
!СКА ACRON-F ;
!СКУ ACRON-F ;
!СЛВЗ ACRON-F ;
!СЛДК ACRON-F ;
!СЛИ ACRON-F ;
!СЛПК ACRON-F ;
!СМЕРШ ACRON-F ;
!СМЗ  ACRON-F ;
!СМИ ACRON-F ;
!СМУ  ACRON-F ;
!СНГ ACRON-F ;
!СНК  ACRON-F ;
!СОБР ACRON-F ;
!СОФИН ACRON-F ;
!СОЦ ACRON-F ;
!СП ACRON-F ;
!СПб ACRON-F ;
!СПбГУ ACRON-F ;
!СПбГУСЭ ACRON-F ;
!СПК ACRON-F ;
!СПОГАТ ACRON-F ;
!СПТУ  ACRON-F ;
!СС ACRON-F ;
!ССО  ACRON-F ;
!ССП  ACRON-F ;
!ССР  ACRON-F ;
!СССР  ACRON-F ;
!СТО ACRON-F ;
!СТФ   ACRON-F ;
!СТЭК ACRON-F ;
!СУ ACRON-F ;
!СУАЛ ACRON-F ;
!СУС  ACRON-F ;
!СЦБТ ACRON-F ;
!США  ACRON-F ;
!СыктГУ ACRON-F ;
!СЭВ ACRON-F ;
!ТАП  ACRON-F ;
!ТАСС  ACRON-F ;
!ТАССР ACRON-F ;
!ТГУ ACRON-F ;
!ТИК ACRON-F ;
!ТКЗХ ACRON-F ;
!ТКУ ACRON-F ;
!ТНТ ACRON-F ;
!ТОЗ   ACRON-F ;
!ТОО ACRON-F ;
!ТОС ACRON-F ;
!ТПК ACRON-F ;
!ТПП ACRON-F ;
!ТСЖ ACRON-F ;
!ТУ  ACRON-F ;
!ТЭФИ ACRON-F ;
!ТЭЦ  ACRON-F ;
!УАЗ  ACRON-F ;
!УАССР ACRON-F ;
!УБОП ACRON-F ;
!УВД ACRON-F ;
!УВД-ОВД ACRON-F ;
!УГБ ACRON-F ;
!УГИБДД ACRON-F ;
!УГТУ ACRON-F ;
!УдГУ ACRON-F ;
!УЖД ACRON-F ;
!УЗИ  ACRON-F ;
!УИИ ACRON-F ;
!УИК ACRON-F ;
!УИН ACRON-F ;
!УКОМ ACRON-F ;
!УКП ACRON-F ;
!УКС ACRON-F ;
!УМВД ACRON-F ;
!УНА-УПА ACRON-F ;
!УНКВД ACRON-F ;
!УОНО  ACRON-F ;
!УПА ACRON-F ;
!УПН ACRON-F ;
!УР ACRON-F ;
!УРБ ACRON-F ;
!УРС  ACRON-F ;
!УСЕВЛОН ACRON-F ;
!УССР  ACRON-F ;
!УФМС ACRON-F ;
!УФПС ACRON-F ;
!УФСБ ACRON-F ;
!УФСИН ACRON-F ;
!УФССП ACRON-F ;
!УЧК  ACRON-F ;
!ФАП ACRON-F ;
!ФГУ ACRON-F ;
!ФГУП ACRON-F ;
!ФЗД ACRON-F ;
!ФЗО  ACRON-F ;
!ФЗУ  ACRON-F ;
!ФИФА ACRON-F ;
!ФЛГР ACRON-F ;
!ФНС ACRON-F ;
!ФОМС ACRON-F ;
!ФРГ  ACRON-F ;
!ФСБ ACRON-F ;
!ФСКН ACRON-F ;
!ФССП ACRON-F ;
!ЦБ ACRON-F ;
!ЦБТИ ACRON-F ;
!ЦВР ACRON-F ;
!ЦГА  ACRON-F ;
!ЦДТ ACRON-F ;
!ЦЗН ACRON-F ;
!ЦИК  ACRON-F ;
!ЦК  ACRON-F ;
!ЦНИИМЭ ACRON-F ;
!ЦРБ ACRON-F ;
!ЦРМ  ACRON-F ;
!ЦРУ ACRON-F ;
!ЦСКА ACRON-F ;
!ЦСУ  ACRON-F ;
!ЦУМ ACRON-F ;
!ЧК  ACRON-F ;
!ЧП  ACRON-F ;
!ШКМ  ACRON-F ;
!ШСУ  ACRON-F ;
!ХАД ACRON-F ;
!ЧАЭС ACRON-F ;
!ЧГТРК ACRON-F ;
!ЧОН ACRON-F ;
!ЧОС ACRON-F ;
!ЧССР ACRON-F ;
!ШВК ACRON-F ;
!ШИК ACRON-F ;
!ЭВМ ACRON-F ;
!ЭССР ACRON-F ;
!ЮАР ACRON-F ;
!ЮПС ACRON-F ;
!ЮЭС ACRON-F ;
!ЮКОС ACRON-F ;
!ЮНЕСКО ACRON-F ;

! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

! These give clause boundaries before capital letters
! and numbers, but not elsewhere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB 10 av oss er innflyttere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB Saara er også innflytter.
! Vi vet at Sth. er en fin by.


LEXICON ITRAB


в ab ;
г ab ;
гг ab ;


! =============================================== !
!    Transitive number-related abbreviations      !
! =============================================== !

! These ones are transitive when followed by numbers or
! singleton letters, and intransitive elsewhere.
! Gården har Gnr. 10.
! Gården har Gnr. 5. a.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. CLB Det er et problem.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. og det er et problem.

LEXICON TRNUMAB

Apd		ab-dot ;                                      !
Вып ab-dot ;


! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON TRAB

! dot% noStb.db
! Abbreviations that never induce sentence boundaries

досл ab-dot ;

! fenr. 10.
! fenr. 5. a.
! fenr. Ståhl.
! fenr. stål.
! They simply do never give CLB.

! Capital
А ab-dot-noun ;
Б ab-dot-noun ;
В ab-dot-noun ;
Г ab-dot-noun ;
Д ab-dot-noun ;
Е ab-dot-noun ;
Ж ab-dot-noun ;
З ab-dot-noun ;
И ab-dot-noun ;
Й ab-dot-noun ;
К ab-dot-noun ;
Л ab-dot-noun ;
М ab-dot-noun ;
Н ab-dot-noun ;
О ab-dot-noun ;
П ab-dot-noun ;
Р ab-dot-noun ;
С ab-dot-noun ;
Т ab-dot-noun ;
У ab-dot-noun ;
Ф ab-dot-noun ;
Х ab-dot-noun ;
Ц ab-dot-noun ;
Ч ab-dot-noun ;
Ш ab-dot-noun ;
Щ ab-dot-noun ;
Ъ ab-dot-noun ;
Ы ab-dot-noun ;
Ь ab-dot-noun ;
Э ab-dot-noun ;
Ю ab-dot-noun ;
Я ab-dot-noun ;
Ё ab-dot-noun ;
І ab-dot-noun ;
Ӧ ab-dot-noun ;

! Small
а ab-noun ;
б ab-noun ;
в ab-noun ;
г ab-noun ;
д ab-noun ;
е ab-noun ;
ж ab-noun ;
з ab-noun ;
и ab-noun ;
й ab-noun ;
к ab-noun ;
л ab-noun ;
м ab-noun ;
н ab-noun ;
о ab-noun ;
п ab-noun ;
р ab-noun ;
с ab-noun ;
т ab-noun ;
у ab-noun ;
ф ab-noun ;
х ab-noun ;
ц ab-noun ;
ч ab-noun ;
ш ab-noun ;
щ ab-noun ;
ъ ab-noun ;
ы ab-noun ;
ь ab-noun ;
э ab-noun ;
ю ab-noun ;
я ab-noun ;
ё ab-noun ;
і ab-noun ;
ӧ ab-noun ;
